Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE A. HEALTH COVERAGE IN GENERAL

CHAPTER 1210. NOTICE OF CERTAIN POLICY PROVISIONS

Sec. 1210.001. NOTICE REQUIRED. A policy, contract, or certificate of insurance that insures against loss resulting from sickness or accidental bodily injury and that is subject to an increase in the premium at time of renewal or to nonrenewal on the insured attaining a certain age may not be delivered, issued, or used in this state unless the document contains on the first page above the policy provisions a printed notice in 10-point type that states that the policy, contract, or certificate is subject to either or both conditions.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.